Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8001
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-8001 to 71-8008 shall be known and may be cited as the Certified Industrial Hygienist Title Protection Act.

Laws 1997, LB 558, § 1.